New York, session 2025-2026, A7855.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 245.15 of the penal law is REPEALED and four new 2 sections 245.15, 245.16, 245.17 and 245.18 are added to read as follows: 3 § 245.15 Unlawful dissemination or publication of an intimate image; 4 definitions, application. 5 1. The following definitions shall apply to sections 245.16, 245.17, 6 and 245.18 of this article: 7 (a) "Intimate part" means the naked genitals, pubic area, anus or 8 female nipple of the person; 9 (b) "Disseminate" and "publish" shall have the same meaning as defined 10 in section 250.40 of this title; 11 (c) "Sexual conduct" shall have the same meaning as defined in subdi- 12 vision ten of section 130.00 of this part; 13 (d) "Digitization" shall mean to alter an image in a realistic manner 14 utilizing an image or images of a person, other than the person 15 depicted, or computer-generated images; and 16 (e) "Person" shall mean a natural person. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11497-06-5 A. 7855--A 2 1 2. The following provisions shall apply to sections 245.16, 245.17, 2 and 245.18 of this article: 3 (a) The provisions of sections 245.16, 245.17, and 245.18 shall not 4 apply to the following: 5 (i) the reporting of unlawful conduct; 6 (ii) the dissemination or publication of an intimate image made in the 7 course of official law enforcement duties, legal proceedings or criminal 8 prosecution, or medical treatment; 9 (iii) images involving voluntary exposure in a public setting; or 10 (iv) dissemination or publication of an intimate image made for a 11 legitimate public purpose. 12 (b) Nothing in section 245.16, 245.17, or 245.18 shall be construed to 13 limit, or to enlarge, the protections that 47 U.S.C § 230 confers on an 14 interactive computer service for content provided by another information 15 content provider, as such terms are defined in 47 U.S.C. § 230. 16 (c) Dissemination of multiple intimate images of the same individual 17 as part of a common act shall be considered a single offense. 18 (d) (i) A violation of section 245.16, 245.17, or 245.18 shall be 19 deemed to be committed within the state if any conduct that is an 20 element of the offense occurs within the state. 21 (ii) Prosecution for a violation of section 245.16, 245.17, or 245.18 22 may be tried in any jurisdiction in which the offense was committed or a 23 victim resides. 24 § 245.16 Unlawful dissemination or publication of an intimate image in 25 the third degree. 26 A person is guilty of unlawful dissemination or publication of an 27 intimate image in the third degree when such person: 28 1. intentionally disseminates or publishes a still or video image 29 depicting another person with one or more intimate parts exposed or 30 engaging in sexual conduct with another person, including an image 31 created or altered by digitization, where such person depicted may 32 reasonably be identified from the still or video image itself or from 33 information displayed in connection with the still or video image; and 34 2. knew or reasonably should have known that the person depicted did 35 not consent to or license such dissemination or publication, including 36 the dissemination or publication of an image taken with the consent of 37 the person depicted when such person had a reasonable expectation that 38 the image would remain private, regardless of whether the actor was 39 present when such image was taken. 40 Unlawful dissemination or publication of an intimate image in the 41 third degree is a class A misdemeanor. 42 § 245.17 Unlawful dissemination or publication of an intimate image in 43 the second degree. 44 A person is guilty of unlawful dissemination or publication of an 45 intimate image in the second degree when such person is eighteen years 46 of age or older and commits the crime of unlawful dissemination or 47 publication of an intimate image in the third degree and: 48 1. such person has previously been convicted of unlawful dissemination 49 or publication of an intimate image in the third degree, including a 50 conviction which occurred prior to such person reaching the age of eigh- 51 teen; or 52 2. such person commits such crime with intent to cause economic, phys- 53 ical, or substantial emotional harm to the person depicted in the inti- 54 mate image or to secure pecuniary gain from the unlawful dissemination 55 or publication of the intimate image. A. 7855--A 3 1 Unlawful dissemination or publication of an intimate image in the 2 second degree is a class E felony. 3 § 245.18 Unlawful dissemination or publication of an intimate image in 4 the first degree. 5 A person is guilty of unlawful dissemination or publication of an 6 intimate image in the first degree when such person is eighteen years of 7 age or older and commits the crime of unlawful dissemination or publica- 8 tion of an intimate image in the third degree and: 9 1. such person has previously been convicted of the crime of unlawful 10 dissemination or publication of an intimate image in the second degree 11 as defined in subdivision one of section 245.17 of this article; or 12 2. such person commits the crime of unlawful dissemination or publica- 13 tion of an intimate image in the second degree as defined in subdivision 14 two of section 245.17 of this article and the person against whom the 15 offense is committed is targeted due to such person's race, religious 16 conviction, gender, disability, gender identity, sexual orientation, 17 color, or ethnic or national origin. 18 Unlawful dissemination or publication of an intimate image in the 19 first degree is a class D felony. 20 § 2. Subdivision 3 of section 30.10 of the criminal procedure law is 21 amended by adding two new paragraphs (i) and (j) to read as follows: 22 (i) A prosecution for unlawful dissemination or publication of an 23 intimate image in the third degree as defined in section 245.16 of the 24 penal law must be commenced within five years of the commission of the 25 crime. 26 (j) A prosecution for unlawful dissemination or publication of an 27 intimate image in the first or second degree as defined in sections 28 245.17 and 245.18 of the penal law must be commenced within seven years 29 of the commission of the crime, or, in the exercise of reasonable dili- 30 gence, within three years after the aggrieved party should have discov- 31 ered the unlawful dissemination or publication of an intimate image, 32 whichever is later. 33 § 3. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 34 have become a law.